Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.230

Notice of infraction—Service.

The department may issue a notice of infraction if the department reasonably believes that the contractor has committed an infraction under this chapter. A notice of infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on the contractor named in the notice by the department's compliance inspectors or service can be made using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed directed to the contractor named in the notice of infraction at the contractor's last known address of record. If the contractor named in the notice of infraction is a firm or corporation, the notice may be personally served on any employee of the firm or corporation. If a notice of infraction is personally served upon an employee of a firm or corporation, the department shall send a copy of the notice using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the contractor if the department is able to obtain the contractor's address.

[ 2011 c 301 s 2; 2007 c 436 s 12; 1997 c 314 s 15; 1993 c 454 s 9; 1986 c 197 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 454: See note following RCW 18.27.010.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.